District of Columbia statutes.
16-2702

Party plaintiff; statute of limitations.

An action pursuant to this chapter shall be brought by and in the name of the personal representative of the deceased person, and within 2 years after the death of the person injured.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 596, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
Oct. 22, 2012, D.C. Law 19-177, § 3, 59 DCR 9353

Cross References

Death or injury caused by defective or unsafe improvements to real property, actions, see § 12-310

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-2702.
1973 Ed., § 16-2702.

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-177 substituted “2 years” for “one year.”

Temporary Legislation

Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-147 substituted “2 years” for “one year”.
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 19-147 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Wrongful Death Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-338, March 30, 2012, 59 DCR 2567).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Wrongful Death Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-390, July 9, 2012, 59 DCR 8499).